Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 1
COLORADO CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT

Law reviews:

For article, "The

C

olorado

C

onsumer Protection Act: An Update", see 29 Colo. Law. 37 (Jan. 2000); for article, "The Law of Trade Secrecy and Covenants Not to Compete in Colorado - Part I", see 30 Colo. Law. 7 (April 2001); for article, "The Limitations of the Colorado Consumer Protection Act in Insurance Bad Faith Litigation", see 34 Colo. Law. 75 (Nov. 2005); for article, "Managing Risks Associated With Attorney Advertising", see 36 Colo. Law. 63 (April 2007); for comment, "Opening the Door: Crow v. Tull and the Application of the Colorado Consumer Protection Act to Attorneys", 79 U. Colo. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

Section

PART 1 CONSUMER PROTECTION
- GENERAL

PART 2 AUTO RENTAL CONTRACTS -
COLLISION DAMAGE WAIVERS

PART 3 PREVENTION OF
TELEMARKETING FRAUD

PART 4 WARRANTIES FOR ASSISTIVE
TECHNOLOGY ACT

PART 5 WARRANTIES FOR FACILITATIVE
TECHNOLOGY ACT

PART 6 SELLERS OF MANUFACTURED HOMES -
REGISTRATION, ESCROW AND
BONDING, AND CONTRACT
REQUIREMENTS

PART 7 SPECIFIC PROVISIONS

PART 8 SWEEPSTAKES AND CONTESTS

PART 9 COLORADO NO-CALL LIST ACT

PART 10 RESTRICTIONS ON USE OF LOAN INFORMATION - SOLICITATIONS

PART 11 COLORADO FORECLOSURE PROTECTION ACT

SUBPART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

SUBPART 2 FORECLOSURE CONSULTANTS

SUBPART 3 EQUITY PURCHASERS

PART 12 PEER-TO-PEER CAR SHARING ACT

PART 13 COLORADO PRIVACY ACT

PART 14 ONLINE MARKETPLACES

PART 15 CONSUMER RIGHT TO REPAIR